Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.020

Acquisition of property by universities and The Evergreen State College.

The boards of regents of the University of Washington and Washington State University, respectively, and the boards of trustees of Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College, respectively, shall have the power and authority to acquire by exchange, gift, purchase, lease, or condemnation in the manner provided by chapter 8.04 RCW for condemnation of property for public use, such lands, real estate and other property, and interests therein as they may deem necessary for the use of said institutions respectively. However, the purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities is subject to the approval of the student achievement council under RCW 28B.77.080.

[ 2012 c 229 s 509; 2004 c 275 s 47; 1985 c 370 s 50; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.020. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 16; 1947 c 104 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4623-20. Formerly RCW 28.76.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.